Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB84.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An administrative body shall not interpret a statute or administrative regulation with the expectation that
the interpretation of the administrative body is entitled to deference from a reviewing court.
(2) The interpretation of a statute or administrative regulation by an administrative body shall not be entitled to
deference from a reviewing court.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 446 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A court reviewing an administrative body's action, including without limitation a petition for judicial review of an
administrative body's rulemaking or adjudicatory actions, shall apply de novo review to the administrative body's
interpretation of statutes, administrative regulations, and other questions of law.
Section 3. KRS 13B.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 452.005, review of a final order shall be conducted by the court without a jury and
shall be confined to the record, unless there is fraud or misconduct involving a party engaged in administration
of this chapter. The court, upon request, may hear oral argument and receive written briefs. Challenges to the
constitutionality of a final order shall be reviewed in accordance with KRS 452.005.
(2) The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the agency as to the weight of the evidence on questions
of fact. The court may affirm the final order or it may reverse the final order, in whole or in part, and remand
the case for further proceedings if it finds the agency's final order is:
(a) In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;
(b) In excess of the statutory authority of the agency;
(c) Without support of substantial evidence on the whole record;
(d) Arbitrary, capricious, or characterized by abuse of discretion;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(e) Based on an ex parte communication which substantially prejudiced the rights of any party and likely
affected the outcome of the hearing;
(f) Prejudiced by a failure of the person conducting a proceeding to be disqualified pursuant to KRS
13B.040(2); or
(g) Deficient as otherwise provided by law.
(3) The court shall apply de novo review of the agency's final order on questions of law. An agency's
interpretation of a statute or administrative regulation shall not be entitled to deference from a reviewing
court.
Veto Overridden March 27, 2025.